Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-266
Bondholders; pledge; agreement of the state.

The state hereby pledges to and agrees with the holder of any bonds issued under the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act that the state will not limit or alter the rights vested in the authority to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders of the bonds or in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders until the bonds, together with the interest on such bonds, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and with all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders, are fully met and discharged. The authority may include this pledge and agreement of the state in any agreement with the holders of the bonds.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 66;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 64.